Hawaii statutes.
§414D-283 Grounds for revocation of
certificate of authority. The department director may commence a
proceeding under section 414D-284 to revoke the certificate of authority of a
foreign corporation authorized to transact business in this State if:

(1) The corporation fails to:

(A) Pay any fees prescribed by law;

(B) File its annual report for a period of
two years;

(C) Appoint and maintain an agent for service
of process as required; or

(D) File a statement of a change in the name
or business address of the agent as required by chapter 425R; or

(2) A misrepresentation has been made of any material
matter in any application, report, affidavit, or other record or document
submitted by the corporation. [L 2001, c 105, pt of §1; am L 2002, c 130, §67;
am L 2003, c 124, §39; am L 2009, c 55, §27]

Previous
Vol08_Ch0401-0429
Next